Utah statutes.
4-26-101.   Failure to close entrance to enclosure -- Class C misdemeanor -- Damages.

A person who willfully throws down a fence or opens bars or gates into any enclosure other than the person's own enclosure or into any enclosure jointly owned or occupied by such person and others, and leaves it open is guilty of a class C misdemeanor, and is liable in damage for any injury sustained by any person as a result of such an act.

